test/src/morphology/V-elaemae48_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - elämä: # Verb (48) elämä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     elämä+V+Inf/mA: elämä
     elämä+V+Inf: elläq
     elämä+V+ActPrtPrc: elänüq
     elämä+V+PssPrtPrc: elet
     elämä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: elä
     elämä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: eläs
     elämä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: `elli
     elämä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: `elli
